Utah statutes.
23-20-10.   Butcher, locker or storage plant to require proper tag or
donation slip.
It is unlawful for any butcher or owner or employee of a locker plant or
storage plant to receive for processing or storage the carcass of any
protected wildlife which by law or regulation is required to be tagged, unless
the carcass has attached to it the required tag or proper donation slip.
